apertium-epo-fra.epo.dix
    <pardef n="Wikipedia__np">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="CX__num">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="unu__num">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nul__num">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="du__num">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>cent</l>         <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>mil</l>          <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>cent</l>         <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>mil</l>          <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>cent</l>         <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>mil</l>          <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<!--
      <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>oj</l>        <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>on</l>        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ojn</l>       <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="million__num">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dudek__num">
<!-- per als 21 33 44 etc -->
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r></r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>unu</l>          <r><b/>unu</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>du</l>           <r><b/>du</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>tri</l>          <r><b/>tri</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>kvar</l>         <r><b/>kvar</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>kvin</l>         <r><b/>kvin</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>ses</l>          <r><b/>ses</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>sep</l>          <r><b/>sep</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>ok</l>           <r><b/>ok</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>naŭ</l>          <r><b/>naŭ</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e><p><l>mi</l>               <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vi</l>               <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ci</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>vi</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>vi</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>li</l>               <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ŝi</l>               <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ĝi</l>               <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ni</l>               <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ili</l>              <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ili</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ili</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oni</l>              <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="si__prn">
      <e r="RL"><p><l>si</l>        <r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>si</l>               <r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sin</l>              <r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>si</l>        <r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>sin</l>       <r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>si</l>        <r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>sin</l>       <r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>sin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>sin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>sin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_m/ia__prn">
      <e><p><l>ia</l>               <r>ia<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ian</l>              <r>ia<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iaj</l>              <r>ia<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iajn</l>             <r>ia<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Aluminum Corp. of China">        <i>Aluminum<b/>Corp.<b/>of<b/>China</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Banco Bilbao">                   <i>Banco<b/>Bilbao</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="China Guodian">                  <i>China<b/>Guodian</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dai Nippon Printing">            <i>Dai<b/>Nippon<b/>Printing</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="dek">                            <i>dek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
    <e lm="du">                             <i>du</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ducent">                         <i>ducent</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dudek">                          <i>dudek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
    <e lm="Fluor">                          <i>Fluor</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Honeywell">                      <i>Honeywell</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="I">                              <i>I</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
    <e lm="III">                            <i>III</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ilia">                           <i>il</i><par n="la_m/ia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="IX">                             <i>IX</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
    <e lm="Kohl's">                         <i>Kohl's</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="kvar">                           <i>kvar</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
    <e lm="kvarcent">                       <i>kvarcent</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
    <e lm="kvardek">                        <i>kvardek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
    <e lm="kvincent">                       <i>kvincent</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
    <e lm="kvindek">                        <i>kvindek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
 <e lm="la ĝia"><i>la<b/>ĝ</i><par n="la_m/ia__prn"/></e>
 <e lm="la ilia"><i>la<b/>il</i><par n="la_m/ia__prn"/></e>
 <e lm="la lia"><i>la<b/>l</i><par n="la_m/ia__prn"/></e>
 <e lm="la mia"><i>la<b/>m</i><par n="la_m/ia__prn"/></e>
 <e lm="la nia"><i>la<b/>n</i><par n="la_m/ia__prn"/></e>
 <e lm="la ŝia"><i>la<b/>ŝ</i><par n="la_m/ia__prn"/></e>
 <e lm="la via"><i>la<b/>v</i><par n="la_m/ia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="lia">                            <i>l</i><par n="la_m/ia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="M">                              <i>M</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
    <e lm="mia">                            <i>m</i><par n="la_m/ia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="miliono">                        <i>miliono</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
    <e lm="Mitsubishi Electric">            <i>Mitsubishi<b/>Electric</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="naŭcent">                        <i>naŭcent</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
    <e lm="naŭdek">                         <i>naŭdek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nul">                            <i>nul</i><par n="nul__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ok">                             <i>ok</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
    <e lm="okdek">                          <i>okdek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
    <e lm="personaj pronomoj de subjekto">  <i></i><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="Philips Electronics">            <i>Philips<b/>Electronics</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sberbank">                       <i>Sberbank</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="sep">                            <i>sep</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sepdek">                         <i>sepdek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ses">                            <i>ses</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sesdek">                         <i>sesdek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
    <e lm="si">                             <i></i><par n="si__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ŝia">                            <i>ŝ</i><par n="la_m/ia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="Sysco">                          <i>Sysco</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="tri">                            <i>tri</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tridek">                         <i>tridek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
    <e lm="unu">                            <i>unu</i><par n="unu__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VI">                             <i>VI</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VIII">                           <i>VIII</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
    <e lm="Vodafone">                       <i>Vodafone</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="XI">                             <i>XI</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XIII">                           <i>XIII</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XIX">                            <i>XIX</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XVI">                            <i>XVI</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XXI">                            <i>XXI</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
